Utah statutes.
53A-17a-166.   Enhancement for At-Risk Students Program.

(1) (a)  Subject to the requirements of Subsection (1)(b), the State Board of Education shall distribute money appropriated for the Enhancement for At-Risk Students Program to school districts and charter schools according to a formula adopted by the State Board of Education, after consultation with school districts and charter schools.

(b) (i)  The State Board of Education shall appropriate $1,200,000 from the appropriation for Enhancement for At-Risk Students for a gang prevention and intervention program designed to help students at-risk for gang involvement stay in school.

(ii)  Money for the gang prevention and intervention program shall be distributed to school districts and charter schools through a request for proposals process.

(2)  In establishing a distribution formula under Subsection (1)(a), the State Board of Education shall use the following criteria:

(a)  low performance on U-PASS tests;

(b)  poverty;

(c)  mobility; and

(d)  limited English proficiency.

(3)  A school district or charter school shall use money distributed under this section to improve the academic achievement of students who are at risk of academic failure.

(4)  The State Board of Education shall develop performance criteria to measure the effectiveness of the Enhancement for At-Risk Students Program and make an annual report to the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee on the effectiveness of the program.

